Nevada, session 83, SB136.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 232.0087 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
232.0087 1. At least [once] three times each year, the Office
of Minority Health and Equity, the Commission on Minority Affairs
and the Office for New Americans shall collaborate to facilitate a
meeting between diversity and inclusion liaisons designated
pursuant to NRS 232.0085 and representatives of various minority
groups to make recommendations regarding and address:
(a) Matters of mutual concern between state agencies and
minority groups;
(b) Opportunities to collaborate and increase the accessibility
and inclusivity of services delivered to minority groups;
(c) The need for state agencies to eliminate systemic racism and
structures of racial discrimination within the State of Nevada; and
(d) Strategies for ensuring that members of minority groups are
able to access programs and services offered by the state agency and
interact with the State Government.
2. On or before January 1 of each year, the Office of Minority
Health and Equity, the Commission on Minority Affairs and the
Office for New Americans shall collaborate on and submit to the
Governor and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislative Commission a report on the findings
and recommendations from the [meeting] meetings required by
subsection 1.
Sec. 2. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB136*